Utah statutes.
34-39-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Employment invention" means any invention or part thereof conceived,
developed, reduced to practice, or created by an employee which is:
(a)  conceived, developed, reduced to practice, or created by the employee:
(i)  within the scope of his employment;
(ii)  on his employer's time; or
(iii)  with the aid, assistance, or use of any of his employer's property,
equipment, facilities, supplies, resources, or intellectual property;
(b)  the result of any work, services, or duties performed by an employee for
his employer;
(c)  related to the industry or trade of the employer; or
(d)  related to the current or demonstrably anticipated business, research, or
development of the employer.
(2)  "Intellectual property" means any and all patents, trade secrets, know-
how, technology, confidential information, ideas, copyrights, trademarks, and
service marks and any and all rights, applications, and registrations relating
to them.
